Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4925.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 17012. (1) An individual shall not engage in postgraduate
medical study which requires the practice of medicine by that
individual without a full, or limited, or temporary license to
practice under this part.
(2) A An individual who is granted a limited license for a
postgraduate shall require that the individual confine his or her
for a postgraduate education residency program approved by the
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


board shall confine the individual's practice and training to a
hospital or institution approved by the board for the training. The
hospital or institution is responsible for the training. A limited
license for a postgraduate education residency program that is
granted under this subsection is renewable for not more than 5
years.
Sec. 17012a. (1) Beginning 18 months after the effective date
of the amendatory act that added this section, the board may grant
a temporary license to engage in the practice of medicine to an
applicant if the applicant demonstrates all of the following to the
board:
(a) The applicant has completed the requirements for a degree
in medicine at a medical school that is located outside the United
States or Canada and that is listed in the World Directory of
Medical Schools, a directory maintained by the World Federation for
Medical Education and the Foundation for Advancement of
International Medical Education and Research, and that meets or
exceeds the standards of medical schools located in the United
States or Canada, as determined by the board.
(b) The applicant was authorized to practice medicine in a
country other than the United States or Canada and practiced
medicine in that country for not less than 3 years within the 8
years immediately preceding the date of the application for
temporary licensure under this section.
(c) The applicant has a certification issued by the
Educational Commission for Foreign Medical Graduates or an
equivalent certification as determined by the board. The board may
waive the certification requirement described in this subdivision
if the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


the applicant is unable to obtain the required documentation from a
noncooperating country.
(d) The applicant has successfully completed step 1 and step 2
of the United States Medical Licensing Examination or an equivalent
medical licensure examination as determined by the board.
(e) Subject to subsection (2), the applicant has entered into
an agreement with a participating facility or practice for full-
time employment under the supervision of a physician who is fully
licensed under this part.
(f) The applicant meets any other requirement established by
the board.
(2) The agreement required under subsection (1) must require
the participating facility or practice to assess and evaluate the
applicant's nonclinical skills and other skills that the board
considers appropriate to the practice of medicine in this state,
according to evaluation criteria developed or approved by the
board, and to provide the department, on request, with a letter
from the physician described in subsection (1)(e) attesting to the
applicant's competence to engage in the practice of medicine in
this state. An applicant seeking a temporary license under this
section shall obtain a temporary license before beginning the
supervised employment experience. A temporary license granted under
this section is valid for 2 years and is renewable only once.
(3) The board may grant a limited license to engage in the
practice of medicine to an applicant who holds a temporary license
under subsection (1) if the applicant demonstrates all of the
following to the board:
(a) The applicant has held the temporary license for not less
than 2 years.
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


(b) The applicant has successfully completed step 3 of the
United States Medical Licensing Examination or an equivalent
medical licensure examination as determined by the board.
(c) The applicant has the nonclinical and other skills that
the board considers appropriate to the practice of medicine in this
state, based on an assessment and evaluation of the applicant under
subsection (2) by a participating facility or practice, and a
letter of recommendation from the physician described in subsection
(1)(e).
(d) The applicant is not subject to any disciplinary action or
pending investigations.
(4) An individual who is granted a limited license under
subsection (3) may engage in the practice of medicine without the
supervision of a physician who is fully licensed under this part,
but the individual shall confine the individual's practice to a
medically underserved area of this state. A limited license that is
granted under this section is valid for 2 years and is renewable
only once.
(5) This section does not require new or additional third-
party reimbursement or mandated worker's compensation benefits for
services rendered by an individual who is licensed under this
section.
(6) As used in this section:
(a) "Medically underserved area of this state" means an area
of this state that is a primary care health professional shortage
area, as determined by the Health Resources and Services
Administration of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services.
(b) "Participating facility or practice" means a federally
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


qualified health center, a hospital licensed under article 17, or
another facility that is approved by the board, or a group practice
of 4 or more physicians.
Sec. 17012b. (1) The department shall collect and maintain all
of the following information for purposes of section 17012a:
(a) The number of applicants for a temporary license and a
limited license.
(b) The number of applicants who are denied a temporary
license or a limited license.
(c) The number of individuals who are granted a temporary
license or limited license.
(d) The number of individuals who are granted a license under
section 17031(2)(b).
(2) The department shall submit an annual report containing
the information required under subsection (1) to the senate and
house of representatives standing committees on health policy. The
report required under this subsection may also include specific
recommendations for any changes to section 17012a that the
department considers necessary or appropriate.
Sec. 17031. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), an
applicant, in addition to completing the requirements for the
degree in medicine, shall complete a period of postgraduate
education to attain proficiency in the practice of the profession,
as prescribed by the board in rules, as a condition for more than
limited or temporary licensure.
(2) The board may grant a full license to practice medicine to
an applicant who has completed the requirements for a degree in
medicine at a medical school located outside the United States or
Canada if, except as provided in subsection (4), the applicant
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


demonstrates to the board all 1 of the following:
(a) That the applicant has met all of the following:
(i) The applicant has engaged in the practice of medicine for
not less than 10 years after completing the requirements for a
degree in medicine.
(ii) (b) That the The applicant has completed not less than 3
years of postgraduate clinical training in an institution that has
an affiliation with a medical school that is listed in a directory
of medical schools published by the World Health Organization the
World Directory of Medical Schools, a directory maintained by the
World Federation for Medical Education and the Foundation for
Advancement of International Medical Education and Research, as
approved by the board.
(iii) (c) That the The applicant has achieved a score determined
by the board to be a passing score on an initial medical licensure
examination approved by the board.
(iv) (d) That the The applicant has safely and competently
practiced medicine under a clinical academic limited license
granted by the board under this article for 1 or more academic
institutions located in this state for not less than the 2 years
immediately preceding the date of application for a license under
this subsection, subdivision, during which time the applicant
functioned not less than 800 hours per year in the observation and
treatment of patients.
(b) That the applicant has safely and competently practiced
medicine under a limited license granted under section 17012a for
not less than 2 years immediately preceding the date of the
application for a license under this subdivision.
(3) An applicant who is required to meet the requirements of
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq


subsection (2)(d) (2)(a)(iv) shall file with the board a written
statement from each academic institution upon which the applicant
relies to satisfy that subsection. The statement shall must
indicate, at a minimum, that the applicant functioned for the
academic institution in the observation and treatment of patients
not less than 800 hours per year and that in so doing the applicant
practiced medicine safely and competently. A person who in good
faith makes a written statement that is filed under this subsection
is not civilly or criminally liable for that statement. There is a
rebuttable presumption that a person who makes a written statement
that is filed under this subsection has done so in good faith.
(4) Subsection (2)(c) and (d) do (2)(a)(iii) and (iv) does not
apply to an applicant who was granted a clinical academic limited
license after January 1, 2011 but before January 1, 2017 and who
has continuously held a license to practice medicine from the
effective date of the amendatory act that added this subsection
March 27, 2019 through the date of application for a full license
under subsection (2).(2)(a).
Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless House Bill No. 4896 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into
law.
Final Page
EMR H03792'25 (H-3) jpg0bq